Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.220

Postsecondary institution student-level data—Education data center.

(1) In order to be eligible for state student financial aid programs, postsecondary institutions shall submit student-level data to the education data center established in RCW 43.41.400 in accordance with RCW 28B.77.090 for the purposes of legislatively authorized research and evaluation of state postsecondary student aid programs.

(2) The education data center shall determine the appropriate student-level data each postsecondary institution shall report in order to meet the state goals for research and evaluation under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The education data center shall enter data-sharing agreements to facilitate the transfer of required data.

(4) Religious postsecondary institutions that maintain a religious exemption under RCW 28B.85.040 may request an exemption from the council from submitting student-level data to the education data center.

(5) Postsecondary institutions, except for those exempt under subsection (4) of this section, that do not submit student-level data to the education data center may be found ineligible for the state's federally required eligible training provider list and may lose eligibility to participate in the Washington college grant program, established in this chapter. The council's office of student financial assistance shall determine penalties for postsecondary institutions in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) Nothing in this section allows the sharing of confidential information that is prohibited by state or federal law.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "postsecondary institution" means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, a degree-granting institution as defined in RCW 28B.85.010, a private vocational school as defined in RCW 28C.10.020, and a school as defined in RCW 18.16.020.

[ 2019 c 406 s 22.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.